Tennessee, session 114, SB0025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-8-202, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(1) and substituting:
(1) A child's parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian may access all mental
health treatment, medical, rehabilitation, and prescription records resulting from
treatment provided to an unemancipated minor pursuant to this section;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-8-202(c)(2), is amended by
deleting "prescription records" wherever it appears and substituting "mental health treatment,
medical, rehabilitation, and prescription records".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-304, is amended by deleting
subsection (i) and substituting:
(i) If an unemancipated minor receives medical treatment, then the minor's
parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, or other person with medical decision-making
authority for the unemancipated minor may access, and a healthcare provider or
healthcare facility shall provide access to, all medical treatment and prescription records
resulting from medical treatment of the minor, even if the treatment was provided to the
unemancipated minor without parental consent, including, but not limited to, treatment
provided pursuant to § 68-10-104(c), § 68-34-107, § 63-6-220, § 63-6-222, or § 63-6-
223.
SB0025
000087
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-304(j), is amended by deleting
"prescription records" wherever it appears and substituting "medical treatment and prescription
records".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-8-103, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(4) and substituting:
(4) To access and review all health and medical records of the child, including
health and medical records related to treatments available to unemancipated minors
without parental consent;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-176, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(6) and substituting:
(6) An employee of a local education agency:
(A) Acts to control bleeding using a bleeding control kit pursuant to § 49-
2-137; or
(B) Provides bandages, gauze, or ice packs for the treatment of minor
cuts, scrapes, bumps, and bruises.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000087